Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 46.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1212
Reorganized
units; board members.

Members of boards of educational
service units existing prior to approval of any plan of reorganization shall
serve as board members of educational service units which are reorganized
pursuant to sections 79-1206 to 79-1211 until the expiration of their original
terms. Such persons shall be members of the board of the reorganized educational
service unit in which they reside. Within thirty days after approval of any
plan of reorganization by the State Board of Education, the president of the board of each educational service unit
being reorganized shall call a meeting of board members of such educational service unit. At such meeting,
members of each such board shall appoint one member from each election district
to be created pursuant to the plan of reorganization not having representation
on such board to serve until the next general election. The board shall take
all necessary action to prepare for operation of the reorganized educational
service unit following approval of any plan of reorganization by the State
Board of Education. Expenses incurred by such board prior to such times shall
be prorated between the counties comprising the educational service unit on
the basis of the assessed valuation of such counties.

Laws 1969, c. 746, § 3, p. 2810;

Laws 1987, LB 688, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2203.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 929;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 51;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 13;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 46.